Louisiana, session 2026, HB129.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The portion of Louisiana Highway 1, including north and south lanes,
beginning at the intersection of Dr. Martin Luther King Dr. and Ravendale Dr., and ending
thirteen hundred feet north of Deer Park Rd., in Shreveport, Louisiana, shall be known and
is hereby designated as the "Virginia Green Evans Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation
provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's
actual cost for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to
exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1